Hawaii statutes.
[§11-9] Exemptions. The elections
commission shall be exempt from section [26-35(a)(1), (4), and (5)] and shall:

(1) Make direct communications with the governor and
legislature;

(2) Make all decisions regarding employment,
appointment, promotion, transfer, demotion, discharge, and job descriptions of
all officers and employees of or under the jurisdiction of the elections
commission without the approval of the comptroller; and

(3) Purchase all supplies, equipment, or furniture
without the approval of the comptroller.

The elections commission shall follow all
applicable personnel laws. [L 2004, c 57, pt of §6]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next